Hawaii statutes.
§514A-37 Preliminary public reports.
The commission may issue an effective date for a preliminary public report upon
the commission's receipt of a notice of intention the filing of which is
complete except for some particular requirement, or requirements, which is, or
are, at the time not fulfilled, but which may reasonably be expected to be
completed. Preliminary public reports shall not be used for any sale under a
contract for the sale of an apartment in a condominium project, unless the
developer of the project has filed with the commission those documents and that
information required to be submitted with the notification of intention
referred to in sections 514A-31 and 514A-32, including a specimen copy of the
proposed contract of sale and an executed copy of an escrow agreement with a
third party depository for retention and disposition of purchasers' funds in
accordance with section 514A-65. The developer shall prepare the preliminary
public report so as to ensure that the report adequately discloses all material
facts which a prospective purchaser should consider in purchasing an apartment
in the project, and shall ensure that adequate protection for purchasers' funds
has been provided. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2; am L 1991, c 44, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next